Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1008
Floodway, defined.

Floodway shall mean the channel of a watercourse or drainway and the adjacent land areas that are necessary to be reserved in order to discharge the base flood without cumulatively increasing the water surface elevation more than a reasonable height, as designated by the department.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 8;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 76.